src-fst-root.lexc.md
# Greenlandic morphological analyser

Fil for at generere de centrale morfologiske processer i vor grønlandske analysator

# Multicharacter symbols

* **v2** = Alternativt /v/ i låneord, der ikke skal slettes efter /u/
* **AA+** = præfiks
* **TA+** = præfiks

## Tags for POS (primary tags)

### Main Word Classes
* **+N** = Noun
* **+V** = Verb
* **+Pali** = Particle-like - partikellignende
* **+Conj** = Conjunction
* **+Adv** = Adverb
* **+Interj** = Interjection
* **+Pron** = Pronoun
* **+Prop** = Propernoun
* **+Num** = Numeral
* **+Symbol** = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

## Secondary tags

### Tags for Verbs
* **+Gram/IV** = Intransitive Verb !PL 20180319 ny formalisme gennemført livm 20180324
* **+Gram/TV** = Transitive Verb !PL 20180319 ny formalisme gennemført livm 20180324
* **+Gram/HV** = Non-marked agentive Verb (used as Half-transitive)
* **+Gram/Db** = Double-transitive Verb. PL tilføjet 20180319
* **+Gram/Exclm** = Exclamation !Flyttet fra primære tags 20180420 PL
* **@CODE** = upersonlig CONT med NAR+3Sg til højre 

### Tags for Pronouns
* **+Gram/Int** = Interrogative Pronoun
* **+Gram/Pers** = Personal Pronoun
* **+Gram/Coref** = Reflexive Pronoun
* **+Gram/Indef** = Indefinitive Pronoun

### Tags for Other Word Classes
***+Gram/Dem** = Demonstative pronoun, demonstrative adverb or demonstrative interjection
* **+Gram/Cong** = Various Pronoun, eg. tamaq, kisi (personkongruensdeklination)
* **+Gram/Abbr** = Abbreviation
* **+Gram/ACR** = Acronyms
* **+Gram/Adj** = Adjektiver optaget direkte inkl. ubøjet anvendelse før kerne

### Semantics
anatomical. Adskiller qiteq+Sem/an+3SgPoss = qitia fra qiteq+3SgPoss = qeqqa
***+Sem/Be**  <fn:Be> !#náipoĸ
*** +Sem/dur	** tid som periode ulloq=dag/day
***+Sem/event** fx Avannaata Qimussersua
***+Sem/Fem** Forsøg med femininum sml. Sem/Mask
* **+Sem/FirstName** = Attributive
* **+Sem/Geo** = Geographical Propernoun
*** +Sem/H        ** = Menneske
* ** +Sem/HH     ** = Organisationer
*** +Sem/Hprof ** = Menneske erhverv
* **+Sem/Hum** = Non-geographical Propernoun
***+Sem/LastName**  Efternavne
***+Sem/Mailadresse** tag til adresser af typen cccc@cccc.cc
***+Sem/Mask** Forsøg med en ny tag til fornavne af maskulinum
***+Sem/ModeOfMovement** <fn:ModeOfmovement> !#nâgpoĸ
*** +Sem/Remove	** = atserivoq mods. atsiivoq
*** +Sem/temp	** tid som punkt ulloq=dato/date
***+Sem/Time** = Temporal particle !The random adverbial 'phrases' like -riutaa -isaa etc.
***+Sem/Unit** = Unit !Til besværlige låneord som 'time' etc., der optræder absolut
***+Sem/Url** tag til adresser af typen www.ccc.cc
*** +Sem/misse ** tag til at markere usikker possessor for misse

### Grammar
***+Gram/Comp** = Composita !Særlig tag til NIQ ajor/saper/artor/nalu- konstruktioner ved transitive verber
***+Gram/TUT_IP** = Composita !tag til at slette overtallige ip hvis der ikke står tut ved siden af
***+Gram/Refl** = Reflexive, reciprocal or passive !asavoq
***+Gram/Reci** = Reciprocal !naapipput
***+Gram/Pass** = Passive !used when a derivational morpheme not explicitely denotes a passivisation, or when intransitive flexion changes an active verb into a passive
***+Gram/PlurTant** = plurale tantum noun: ilaqutariit
***+Gram/SingTant** = singulare tantum noun: sila
* **+Gram/Ord** = Ordinal number !pingajuat
***+Gram/Hyb** = Følger hybriderne for at bestemme stederne hvor strengene kan klippes i to ord ved hybriderne
*__ +Gram/TransverbNIQ __ = NIQ-former med transitivt verbale egenskaber. PL20210417

### Derivation
* **+Der/Vok** = Vocative
***+Der/Guess** = Guessed lemma and inflection which are not listed in the FST
***+Der/Loan** = Guessed stems which are not listed in the FST and contain non-Greenlandic characters or non-Greenlandic final character
***+Der/Unk** = Ukendt morfem !Ukendte morfemer i ellers analyserede stammer for at få rigtig lemmaanalyse, som orsoq+NNAP+nv+UNK+vn:orsunnattaaq
***+Der/vv** = verb to verb
***+Der/nn** = noun to noun
***+Der/nv** = noun to verb
***+Der/vn** = verb to noun
***+Der/xx** = Follows the enclitic suffix TUQ to be able to distinguish TUQ+xx from the derivational morpheme TUQ+vn in CG: qanortoq
Citerede ordformer  jf. Kleinschmidt ^rpoĸ

### Dialect
* **+Dial/Ngr** = Northern dialect (such as ng for g; predictable dialectal changes might be dealt with in the postprosessor in stead)
* **+Dial/Sgr** = Southern dialect (such as VVC for VVCC), aneeqavoq (and not aneeqqavoq)
* **+Dial/Egr** = Eastern dialect
* **+Dial/Vgr** = Western dialect (such as rng for rn)

### Tags to mark loan word entries with a diverting orthography
That is, they need special treatment in e.g. speech syntesis.
* **+OLang/DAN** = Danish stem: profet
* **+OLang/ENG** = English stem: game
* **+OLang/DEU** = German stem: bier

### Orthograhy
* **+Orth/Arch** = Archaic language, (stem, morpheme, flexion, or sandhi): tikisimavoq, asallutigik, agpâ (for anípâ)
* **+Orth/Youth** = Youth language: asallutigu
* **+Orth/Alt** = Substandard language (hyphens among other things…): isissavoq, Qaanaaq-mut, fabrikki, poor’lu

### Usage/error
* **+Use/-Spell** = Do not include in speller
* **+Use/Hybrid** = For generating split hybrids. Should not be included in speller, analyser, or norm-generator
* **+Err/Sub** = Not authorized spelling: 2-imik
tag, vi ikke bruger, men som optræder i de delte filer

### Ekstra vedr. LG

## Tags for Inflection

### Numerus
* **+Sg** = Singularis
* **+Du** = Dualis
* **+Pl** = Pluralis

### Kasus
* **+Abs** = Absolutive
* **+Rel** = Relative
* **+Trm** = Terminalis
* **+Abl** = Ablative
* **+Lok** = Locative
* **+Aeq** = Aequalis
* **+Ins** = Instrumentalis
* **+Via** = Vialis

### Særlige 3./4. persons kasus med DivPron (Gram/Cong)
* **+Nom** = Nominative
* **+Akk** = Accusative

### Modus
* **+Ind** = Indicative
* **+Int** = Interrogative
* **+Imp** = Imperative
* **+Opt** = Optative
* **+Cau** = Causative
* **+Con** = Conditional
* **+Par** = Participium
* **+Cont** = Infinitive
* **+ContNeg** = Negated Infinitive
* **+IteCau** = Iterative (morphologically: Causative)

### Verb person-numerus
* **+1Sg** = Subject 1.person singular
* **+2Sg** = Subject 2.person singular
* **+3Sg** = Subject 3.person singular
* **+4Sg** = Subject 4.person singular
* **+1Pl** = Subject 1.person plural
* **+2Pl** = Subject 2.person plural
* **+3Pl** = Subject 3.person plural
* **+4Pl** = Subject 4.person plural
* **+1Du** = Subject 1.person dual
* **+2Du** = Subject 2.person dual
* **+3Du** = Subject 3.person dual
* **+4Du** = Subject 4.person dual

* **+1SgO** = Object 1.person singular
* **+2SgO** = Object 2.person singular
* **+3SgO** = Object 3.person singular
* **+4SgO** = Object 4.person singular
* **+1PlO** = Object 1.person plural
* **+2PlO** = Object 2.person plural
* **+3PlO** = Object 3.person plural
* **+4PlO** = Object 4.person plural
* **+1DuO** = Object 1.person dual
* **+2DuO** = Object 2.person dual
* **+3DuO** = Object 3.person dual
* **+4DuO** = Object 4.person dual

### Possesive tags - Possessormarkering i possessum
***+1SgPoss** = Possessor 1.person singular
***+2SgPoss** = Possessor 2.person singular
***+3SgPoss** = Possessor 3.person singular
***+4SgPoss** = Possessor 4.person singular
***+1PlPoss** = Possessor 1.person plural
***+2PlPoss** = Possessor 2.person plural
***+3PlPoss** = Possessor 3.person plural
***+4PlPoss** = Possessor 4.person plural

Flag diacritics til pluralis tantum subjekter

Flag diacritics til verber med kun pluralis i objekterne

Test af boolsk variabel til ad hoc blokeringer

Test af boolsk variabel til ad hoc blokering af Gram/Exclm. stems sættes Off og derivation On

Off-flag sættes i verbs på transitive verber med usandsynlig Refl. On-flag på taggen Gram/Refl i gennemgangslexica

Off-flag på verber som akuaa, der ikke må lave metatese på NIQ

Nyt flag 20211214 for at forebygge *taakkuunngitsoq og *taannaanngitsut

Off-flag på nominer, der SKAL opføre sig replacive som pilersaarusiorpoq og aqqusinniorpoq

Off-flag i nouns og Off-flag i der-inf  når TUR og TUGAQ ikke må assibileres og On-flag, når de skal assibileres. Også for at forebygge assibilering efter HTR på nnip

Flag specielt for at sikre additiv p-bøjning af ulloq i Trm

Flag til forebyggelse af manglende assibilering. P sættes i stem-filerne og C i der-infl

Ad hoc til test af alternativ flag diacritics ved præfikser. Husk også den udkommenterede linie 'Kingumoorutit ;' i LEXICON Root

Test af P- og D-flag til forebyggelse af rekusivitet ved TIP
og blokeres af 

Test 20210504 af P- og R-flag for at generere både takornariat og takornarissat+Err/Sub

Flags for loan words, which must not go to N+Abs+Sg without derivation.

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc)
* »
* « ()
* > (written with square brackets as stem, to avoid collision with the morpheme boundary marker)
* < (written with square brackets as stem, to avoid collision with the morpheme boundary marker)

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: København > københavner.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/LearnGreenlandic/lang-kal/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
